Washington statutes.
RCW 43.83.400

Transfers of real property and facilities to nonprofit corporations.

(1) Public bodies may transfer without further consideration real property and facilities acquired, constructed, or otherwise improved under the handicapped facilities 1979 bond issue to nonprofit corporations organized to provide services for individuals with physical or mental disabilities, in exchange for the promise to continually operate services benefiting the public on the site, subject to all the conditions in this section. For purposes of this section, "transfer" may include lease renewals. The nonprofit corporation shall use the real property and facilities for the purpose of providing the following limited programs as designated by the department of social and health services: Nonprofit community centers, close-to-home living units, employment and independent living training centers, vocational rehabilitation centers, developmental disabilities training centers, and community homes for individuals with mental illness.

(2) The deed transferring the property in subsection (1) of this section must provide for immediate reversion back to the public body if the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The nonprofit corporation is authorized to sell the property transferred to it pursuant to subsection (1) of this section only if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) Any such sale must have the prior written approval by the department of social and health services; (b) all proceeds from such a sale must be applied to the purchase price of a different property or properties of equal or greater value than the original property; (c) any new property or properties must be used for the purposes stated in subsection (1) of this section; (d) the new property or properties must be available for use within one year of sale; and (e) the nonprofit corporation must enter into an agreement with the public entity to reimburse the public entity for the value of the original property at the time of the sale if the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the new property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.

(4) If the nonprofit corporation ceases to use the property for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section, the property and facilities revert immediately to the public body. The public body shall then determine if the property, or the reimbursed amount in the case of a reimbursement under subsection (3)(e) of this section, may be used by another program as designated by the department of social and health services. These programs have priority in obtaining the property to ensure that the purposes specified in the handicapped facilities 1979 bond issue are carried out.

(5) As used in this section, the term "public body" means the state of Washington, or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal corporation thereof, and those Indian tribes now or hereafter recognized as such by the federal government for participation in the federal land and water conservation program and which may constitutionally receive grants or loans from the state of Washington.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 38; 2006 c 35 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.99C.070.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section has been recodified pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(h).

Findings—2006 c 35: "The legislature finds that protecting the public health, safety, and welfare by providing services to needy or vulnerable persons is a fundamental purpose of government. The legislature further finds that private nonprofit corporations fill an important public purpose in providing these types of health, safety, and welfare services to our state's residents. Acting through partnerships with governmental entities, these private sector providers are able to increase the amount and quality of these services available to state residents. The legislature finds that ensuring continued provision of these services in the private sector confers a valuable benefit on the public that constitutes consideration for transfer of certain public property and facilities to eligible private nonprofit corporations, subject to restrictions that provide continued protection of the public interest." [ 2006 c 35 s 1.]